Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1581
Fund; payments to reduce consumptive use of water; conditions.

Payments may be made from the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund to the owners of private land for the purpose of adopting or implementing practices or measures to reduce the consumptive use of water in river basins in which an interstate agreement, compact, or decree could require reduction in water usage.

Payments made pursuant to this section may be made as part of research, cost-sharing, or other programs implemented by natural resources districts, irrigation districts, or other entities to develop incentive-based practices or measures to reduce the consumptive use of water.

Payments made pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with terms and conditions established by the commission. The commission may establish terms and conditions for receipt of payments under this section which are different than those established for receipt of payments pursuant to section 2-1579.

Laws 2003, LB 619, § 2.